Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB714.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 14102(a) of Title 16 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes, added May 8, 2024 (P.L.50, No.14), is amended and the section is amended by adding a subsection to read:§ 14102. Office holders.(a) Counties of the third and fourth classes.--[In] Except as provided under subsection (d.1), in counties of the third and fourth classes, one individual shall hold the office of prothonotary, one individual shall hold the office of clerk of courts, one individual shall hold the offices of register of wills and clerk of orphans' court and one individual shall hold the office of recorder of deeds.* * *12345678910111213141516171819 (d.1) Counties of the fourth class.--Notwithstanding subsection (a) or (b) or any other provision of law, in counties of the fourth class, one individual may hold the offices of prothonotary and clerk of courts.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0714PN0778 - 2 - 123456